Illinois, session 104th, HB1284.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Sections 16-115A, 16-118, and 19-115 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/16-115A)7    Sec. 16-115A. Obligations of alternative retail electric 8suppliers.9    (a) An alternative retail electric supplier:10        (i) shall comply with the requirements imposed on 11    public utilities by Sections 8-201 through 8-207, 8-301, 12    8-505 and 8-507 of this Act, to the extent that these 13    Sections have application to the services being offered by 14    the alternative retail electric supplier;15        (ii) shall continue to comply with the requirements 16    for certification stated in subsection (d) of Section 17    16-115;18        (iii) by May 31, 2020 and every June 30 thereafter, 19    shall submit to the Commission and the Office of the 20    Attorney General the rates the retail electric supplier 21    charged to residential customers in the prior year, 22    including each distinct rate charged and whether the rate 23    was a fixed or variable rate, the basis for the variable   HB1284- 2 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    rate, and any fees charged in addition to the supply rate, 2    including monthly fees, flat fees, or other service 3    charges; and4        (iv) shall make publicly available on its website, 5    without the need for a customer login, rate information 6    for all of its variable, time-of-use, and fixed rate 7    contracts currently available to residential customers, 8    including, but not limited to, fixed monthly charges, 9    early termination fees, and kilowatt-hour charges. 10    (b) An alternative retail electric supplier shall obtain 11verifiable authorization from a customer, in a form or manner 12approved by the Commission consistent with Section 2EE of the 13Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act, before 14the customer is switched from another supplier.15    (c) No alternative retail electric supplier, or electric 16utility other than the electric utility in whose service area 17a customer is located, shall (i) enter into or employ any 18arrangements which have the effect of preventing a retail 19customer with a maximum electrical demand of less than one 20megawatt from having access to the services of the electric 21utility in whose service area the customer is located or (ii) 22charge retail customers for such access. This subsection shall 23not be construed to prevent an arms-length agreement between a 24supplier and a retail customer that sets a term of service, 25notice period for terminating service and provisions governing 26early termination through a tariff or contract as allowed by   HB1284- 3 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1Section 16-119.2    (d) An alternative retail electric supplier that is 3certified to serve residential or small commercial retail 4customers shall not:5        (1) deny service to a customer or group of customers 6    nor establish any differences as to prices, terms, 7    conditions, services, products, facilities, or in any 8    other respect, whereby such denial or differences are 9    based upon race, gender or income, except as provided in 10    Section 16-115E.11        (2) deny service to a customer or group of customers 12    based on locality nor establish any unreasonable 13    difference as to prices, terms, conditions, services, 14    products, or facilities as between localities.15        (3) warrant that it has a residential customer or 16    small commercial retail customer's express consent 17    agreement to access interval data as described in 18    subsection (b) of Section 16-122, unless the alternative 19    retail electric supplier has:20            (A) disclosed to the consumer at the outset of the 21        offer that the alternative retail electric supplier 22        will access the consumer's interval data from the 23        consumer's utility with the consumer's express 24        agreement and the consumer's option to refuse to 25        provide express agreement to access the consumer's 26        interval data; and  HB1284- 4 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1            (B) obtained the consumer's express agreement for 2        the alternative retail electric supplier to access the 3        consumer's interval data from the consumer's utility 4        in a separate letter of agency, a distinct response to 5        a third-party verification, or as a separate 6        affirmative consent during a recorded enrollment 7        initiated by the consumer. The disclosure by the 8        alternative retail electric supplier to the consumer 9        in this Section shall be conducted in, translated 10        into, and provided in a language in which the consumer 11        subject to the disclosure is able to understand and 12        communicate.13        (4) release, sell, license, or otherwise disclose any 14    customer interval data obtained under Section 16-122 to 15    any third person except as provided for in Section 16-122 16    and paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection (d-5) of 17    Section 2EE of the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 18    Practices Act. 19    (e) An alternative retail electric supplier shall comply 20with the following requirements with respect to the marketing, 21offering and provision of products or services to residential 22and small commercial retail customers:23        (i) All marketing materials, including, but not 24    limited to, electronic marketing materials, in-person 25    solicitations, and telephone solicitations, shall contain 26    information that adequately discloses the prices, terms,   HB1284- 5 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    and conditions of the products or services that the 2    alternative retail electric supplier is offering or 3    selling to the customer and shall disclose the current 4    utility electric supply price to compare applicable at the 5    time the alternative retail electric supplier is offering 6    or selling the products or services to the customer and 7    shall disclose the date on which the utility electric 8    supply price to compare became effective and the date on 9    which it will expire. The utility electric supply price to 10    compare shall be the sum of the electric supply charge and 11    the transmission services charge and shall not include the 12    purchased electricity adjustment. The disclosure shall 13    include a statement that the price to compare does not 14    include the purchased electricity adjustment, and, if 15    applicable, the range of the purchased electricity 16    adjustment. All marketing materials, including, but not 17    limited to, electronic marketing materials, in-person 18    solicitations, and telephone solicitations, shall include 19    the following statement: 20            "(Name of the alternative retail electric 21        supplier) is not the same entity as your electric 22        delivery company. You are not required to enroll with 23        (name of alternative retail electric supplier). 24        Beginning on (effective date), the electric supply 25        price to compare is (price in cents per kilowatt 26        hour). The electric utility electric supply price will   HB1284- 6 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        expire on (expiration date). The utility electric 2        supply price to compare does not include the purchased 3        electricity adjustment factor. For more information go 4        to the Illinois Commerce Commission's free website at 5        www.pluginillinois.org.".6        If applicable, the statement shall also include the 7    following statement:8            "The purchased electricity adjustment factor may 9        range between +.5 cents and -.5 cents per kilowatt 10        hour.". 11        This paragraph (i) does not apply to goodwill or 12    institutional advertising. 13        (ii) Before any customer is switched from another 14    supplier, the alternative retail electric supplier shall 15    give the customer written information that adequately 16    discloses, in plain language, the prices, terms and 17    conditions of the products and services being offered and 18    sold to the customer. This written information shall be 19    provided in a language in which the customer subject to 20    the marketing or solicitation is able to understand and 21    communicate, and the alternative retail electric supplier 22    shall not switch a customer who is unable to understand 23    and communicate in a language in which the marketing or 24    solicitation was conducted. The alternative retail 25    electric supplier shall comply with Section 2N of the 26    Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act.   HB1284- 7 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        (iii) An alternative retail electric supplier shall 2    provide documentation to the Commission and to customers 3    that substantiates any claims made by the alternative 4    retail electric supplier regarding the technologies and 5    fuel types used to generate the electricity offered or 6    sold to customers.7        (iv) The alternative retail electric supplier shall 8    provide to the customer (1) itemized billing statements 9    that describe the products and services provided to the 10    customer and their prices, and (2) an additional 11    statement, at least annually, that adequately discloses 12    the average monthly prices, and the terms and conditions, 13    of the products and services sold to the customer.14        (v) All in-person and telephone solicitations shall be 15    conducted in, translated into, and provided in a language 16    in which the consumer subject to the marketing or 17    solicitation is able to understand and communicate. An 18    alternative retail electric supplier shall terminate a 19    solicitation if the consumer subject to the marketing or 20    communication is unable to understand and communicate in 21    the language in which the marketing or solicitation is 22    being conducted. An alternative retail electric supplier 23    shall comply with Section 2N of the Consumer Fraud and 24    Deceptive Business Practices Act.25        (vi) Each alternative retail electric supplier shall 26    conduct training for individual representatives engaged in   HB1284- 8 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    in-person solicitation and telemarketing to residential 2    customers on behalf of that alternative retail electric 3    supplier prior to conducting any such solicitations on the 4    alternative retail electric supplier's behalf. Each 5    alternative retail electric supplier shall submit a copy 6    of its training material to the Commission on an annual 7    basis and the Commission shall have the right to review 8    and require updates to the material. After initial 9    training, each alternative retail electric supplier shall 10    be required to conduct refresher training for its 11    individual representatives every 6 months. 12        (vii) Alternative retail electric suppliers may not 13    pay a commission or other incentive-based compensation to 14    individuals engaged in in-person solicitation or 15    telemarketing. 16    (f) An alternative retail electric supplier may limit the 17overall size or availability of a service offering by 18specifying one or more of the following: a maximum number of 19customers, maximum amount of electric load to be served, time 20period during which the offering will be available, or other 21comparable limitation, but not including the geographic 22locations of customers within the area which the alternative 23retail electric supplier is certificated to serve. The 24alternative retail electric supplier shall file the terms and 25conditions of such service offering including the applicable 26limitations with the Commission prior to making the service   HB1284- 9 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1offering available to customers.2    (g) Nothing in this Section shall be construed as 3preventing an alternative retail electric supplier, which is 4an affiliate of, or which contracts with, (i) an industry or 5trade organization or association, (ii) a membership 6organization or association that exists for a purpose other 7than the purchase of electricity, or (iii) another 8organization that meets criteria established in a rule adopted 9by the Commission, from offering through the organization or 10association services at prices, terms and conditions that are 11available solely to the members of the organization or 12association.13(Source: P.A. 102-459, eff. 8-20-21; 103-237, eff. 6-30-23.) 14    (220 ILCS 5/16-118)15    Sec. 16-118. Services provided by electric utilities to 16alternative retail electric suppliers.17    (a) It is in the best interest of Illinois energy 18consumers to promote fair and open competition in the 19provision of electric power and energy and to prevent 20anticompetitive practices in the provision of electric power 21and energy. Therefore, to the extent an electric utility 22provides electric power and energy or delivery services to 23alternative retail electric suppliers and such services are 24not subject to the jurisdiction of the Federal Energy 25Regulatory Commission, and are not competitive services, they   HB1284- 10 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1shall be provided through tariffs that are filed with the 2Commission, pursuant to Article IX of this Act. Each electric 3utility shall permit alternative retail electric suppliers to 4interconnect facilities to those owned by the utility provided 5they meet established standards for such interconnection, and 6may provide standby or other services to alternative retail 7electric suppliers. The alternative retail electric supplier 8shall sign a contract setting forth the prices, terms and 9conditions for interconnection with the electric utility and 10the prices, terms and conditions for services provided by the 11electric utility to the alternative retail electric supplier 12in connection with the delivery by the electric utility of 13electric power and energy supplied by the alternative retail 14electric supplier.15    (b) An electric utility shall file a tariff pursuant to 16Article IX of the Act that would allow alternative retail 17electric suppliers or electric utilities providing supply 18service through an electric aggregation program other than the 19electric utility in whose service area retail customers are 20located to issue single bills to the retail customers for both 21the services provided by such alternative retail electric 22supplier or other electric utility and the delivery services 23provided by the electric utility to such customers. The tariff 24filed pursuant to this subsection shall (i) require partial 25payments made by retail customers to be credited first to the 26electric utility's tariffed services, (ii) impose commercially   HB1284- 11 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1reasonable terms with respect to credit and collection, 2including requests for deposits, (iii) retain the electric 3utility's right to disconnect the retail customers, if it does 4not receive payment for its tariffed services, in the same 5manner that it would be permitted to if it had billed for the 6services itself, and (iv) require the alternative retail 7electric supplier or other electric utility providing supply 8service through an electric aggregation program that elects 9the billing option provided by this tariff to include on each 10bill to retail customers an identification of the electric 11utility providing the delivery services and a listing of the 12charges applicable to such services. The tariff filed pursuant 13to this subsection may also include other just and reasonable 14terms and conditions. In addition, an electric utility, an 15alternative retail electric supplier or electric utility other 16than the electric utility in whose service area the customer 17is located, and a customer served by such alternative retail 18electric supplier or other electric utility, may enter into an 19agreement pursuant to which the alternative retail electric 20supplier or other electric utility pays the charges specified 21in Section 16-108, or other customer-related charges, 22including taxes and fees, in lieu of such charges being 23recovered by the electric utility directly from the customer.24    (c) An electric utility with more than 100,000 customers 25shall file a tariff pursuant to Article IX of this Act that 26provides alternative retail electric suppliers, and electric   HB1284- 12 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1utilities providing supply service through an electric 2aggregation program other than the electric utility in whose 3service area the retail customers are located, with the option 4to have the electric utility purchase their receivables for 5power and energy service provided to residential retail 6customers and non-residential retail customers with a 7non-coincident peak demand of less than 400 kilowatts through 8an electric aggregation program. Receivables for power and 9energy service of alternative retail electric suppliers or 10electric utilities providing supply service through an 11electric aggregation program other than the electric utility 12in whose service area the retail customers are located shall 13be purchased by the electric utility at a just and reasonable 14discount rate to be reviewed and approved by the Commission 15after notice and hearing. The discount rate shall be based on 16the electric utility's historical bad debt and any reasonable 17start-up costs and administrative costs associated with the 18electric utility's purchase of receivables. The discounted 19rate for purchase of receivables shall be included in the 20tariff filed pursuant to this subsection (c). The discount 21rate filed pursuant to this subsection (c) shall be subject to 22periodic Commission review. The electric utility retains the 23right to impose the same terms on retail customers with 24respect to credit and collection, including requests for 25deposits, and retain the electric utility's right to 26disconnect the retail customers, if it does not receive   HB1284- 13 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1payment for its tariffed services or purchased receivables, in 2the same manner that it would be permitted to if the retail 3customers purchased power and energy from the electric 4utility. The tariff filed pursuant to this subsection (c) 5shall permit the electric utility to recover from retail 6customers any uncollected receivables that may arise as a 7result of the purchase of receivables under this subsection 8(c), may also include other just and reasonable terms and 9conditions, and shall provide for the prudently incurred costs 10associated with the provision of this service pursuant to this 11subsection (c). Nothing in this subsection (c) permits the 12double recovery of bad debt expenses from customers.13    (d) An electric utility with more than 100,000 customers 14shall file a tariff pursuant to Article IX of this Act that 15would provide alternative retail electric suppliers or 16electric utilities providing supply service through an 17electric aggregation program other than the electric utility 18in whose service area retail customers are located with the 19option to have the electric utility produce and provide single 20bills to the retail customers for both the electric power and 21energy service provided by the alternative retail electric 22supplier or other electric utility providing supply service 23through an electric aggregation program and the delivery 24services provided by the electric utility to the customers. 25The tariffs filed pursuant to this subsection shall require 26the electric utility to collect and remit customer payments   HB1284- 14 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1for electric power and energy service provided by alternative 2retail electric suppliers or electric utilities providing 3supply service through an electric aggregation program other 4than the electric utility in whose service area retail 5customers are located. The tariff filed pursuant to this 6subsection shall require the electric utility to include on 7each bill to retail customers an identification of the 8alternative retail electric supplier or other electric utility 9that elects the billing option. The tariff filed pursuant to 10this subsection (d) may also include other just and reasonable 11terms and conditions and shall provide for the recovery of 12prudently incurred costs associated with the provision of 13service pursuant to this subsection (d). The costs associated 14with the provision of service pursuant to this Section shall 15be subject to periodic Commission review. 16    (e) An electric utility with more than 100,000 customers 17in this State shall file a tariff pursuant to Article IX of 18this Act that provides alternative retail electric suppliers, 19and electric utilities providing supply service through an 20electric aggregation program other than the electric utility 21in whose service area the retail customers are located, with 22the option to have the electric utility purchase 2 billing 23cycles worth of uncollectible receivables for power and energy 24service provided to residential retail customers and to 25non-residential retail customers with a non-coincident peak 26demand of less than 400 kilowatts participating in a municipal   HB1284- 15 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1aggregation program upon returning that customer to that 2electric utility for delivery and energy service after that 3alternative retail electric supplier, or an electric utility 4other than the electric utility in whose service area the 5retail customer is located, has made reasonable collection 6efforts on that account. Uncollectible receivables for power 7and energy service of alternative retail electric suppliers, 8or electric utilities providing supply service through an 9electric aggregation program other than the electric utility 10in whose service area the retail customers are located, shall 11be purchased by the electric utility at a just and reasonable 12discount rate to be reviewed and approved by the Commission, 13after notice and hearing. The discount rate shall be based on 14the electric utility's historical bad debt for receivables 15that are outstanding for a similar length of time and any 16reasonable start-up costs and administrative costs associated 17with the electric utility's purchase of receivables. The 18discounted rate for purchase of uncollectible receivables 19shall be included in the tariff filed pursuant to this 20subsection (e). The electric utility retains the right to 21impose the same terms on these retail customers with respect 22to credit and collection, including requests for deposits, and 23retains the right to disconnect these retail customers, if it 24does not receive payment for its tariffed services or 25purchased receivables, in the same manner that it would be 26permitted to if the retail customers had purchased power and   HB1284- 16 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1energy from the electric utility. The tariff filed pursuant to 2this subsection (e) shall permit the electric utility to 3recover from retail customers any uncollectible uncollectable 4receivables that may arise as a result of the purchase of 5uncollectible receivables under this subsection (e), may also 6include other just and reasonable terms and conditions, and 7shall provide for the prudently incurred costs associated with 8the provision of this service pursuant to this subsection (e). 9Nothing in this subsection (e) permits the double recovery of 10utility bad debt expenses from customers. The electric utility 11may file a joint tariff for this subsection (e) and subsection 12(c) of this Section. 13    (f) Every alternative retail electric supplier or electric 14utility other than the electric utility in whose service area 15retail customers are located that issues single bills to the 16retail customers for the services provided by the alternative 17retail electric supplier or other electric utility to the 18customers shall include on the single bills issued to 19residential customers the current utility electric supply 20price to compare that would apply to the customer for the 21billing period if the customer obtained supply from the 22utility. The current utility electric supply price shall be 23the sum of the electric supply charge and the transmission 24services charge and shall disclose that the price does not 25include the monthly purchased electricity adjustment.26    (g) Every electric utility that provides delivery and   HB1284- 17 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1supply services shall include on each bill issued to 2residential customers who obtain supply from an alternative 3retail electric supplier the current utility electric supply 4price to compare that would apply to the customer for the 5billing period if the customer obtained supply from the 6utility. The current utility electric supply price to compare 7shall be the sum of the electric supply charge and the 8transmission services charge and shall disclose that the price 9does not include the monthly purchased electricity adjustment. 10(Source: P.A. 101-590, eff. 1-1-20.) 11    (220 ILCS 5/19-115)12    Sec. 19-115. Obligations of alternative gas suppliers. 13    (a) The provisions of this Section shall apply only to 14alternative gas suppliers serving or seeking to serve 15residential or small commercial customers and only to the 16extent such alternative gas suppliers provide services to 17residential or small commercial customers.18    (b) An alternative gas supplier:19        (1) shall comply with the requirements imposed on 20    public utilities by Sections 8-201 through 8-207, 8-301, 21    8-505 and 8-507 of this Act, to the extent that these 22    Sections have application to the services being offered by 23    the alternative gas supplier;24        (2) shall continue to comply with the requirements for 25    certification stated in Section 19-110;  HB1284- 18 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        (3) shall comply with complaint procedures established 2    by the Commission;3        (4) except as provided in subsection (h) of this 4    Section, shall file with the Chief Clerk of the 5    Commission, within 20 business days after the effective 6    date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly, 7    a copy of bill formats, standard customer contract and 8    customer complaint and resolution procedures, and the name 9    and telephone number of the company representative whom 10    Commission employees may contact to resolve customer 11    complaints and other matters. In the case of a gas 12    supplier that engages in door-to-door solicitation, the 13    company shall file with the Commission the consumer 14    information disclosure required by item (3) of subsection 15    (c) of Section 2DDD of the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive 16    Business Practices Act and shall file updated information 17    within 10 business days after changes in any of the 18    documents or information required to be filed by this item 19    (4);20        (5) shall maintain a customer call center where 21    customers can reach a representative and receive current 22    information. At least once every 6 months, each 23    alternative gas supplier shall provide written information 24    to customers explaining how to contact the call center. 25    The average answer time for calls placed to the call 26    center shall not exceed 60 seconds where a representative   HB1284- 19 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    or automated system is ready to render assistance and/or 2    accept information to process calls. The abandon rate for 3    calls placed to the call center shall not exceed 10%. Each 4    alternative gas supplier shall maintain records of the 5    call center's telephone answer time performance and 6    abandon call rate. These records shall be kept for a 7    minimum of 2 years and shall be made available to 8    Commission personnel upon request. In the event that 9    answer times and/or abandon rates exceed the limits 10    established above, the reporting alternative gas supplier 11    may provide the Commission or its personnel with 12    explanatory details. At a minimum, these records shall 13    contain the following information in monthly increments: 14            (A) total number of calls received;15            (B) number of calls answered;16            (C) average answer time;17            (D) number of abandoned calls; and18            (E) abandon call rate. 19        Alternative gas suppliers that do not have electronic 20    answering capability that meets these requirements shall 21    notify the Manager of the Commission's Consumer Services 22    Division or its successor within 30 days following the 23    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General 24    Assembly and work with Staff to develop individualized 25    reporting requirements as to the call volume and 26    responsiveness of the call center.   HB1284- 20 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        On or before March 1 of every year, each entity shall 2    file a report with the Chief Clerk of the Commission for 3    the preceding calendar year on its answer time and abandon 4    call rate for its call center. A copy of the report shall 5    be sent to the Manager of the Consumer Services Division 6    or its successor; 7        (6) by January 1, 2020 and every September 30 8    thereafter, shall submit to the Commission and the Office 9    of the Attorney General the rates the alternative gas 10    supplier charged to residential customers in the prior 11    year, including each distinct rate charged and whether the 12    rate was a fixed or variable rate, the basis for the 13    variable rate, and any fees charged in addition to the 14    supply rate, including monthly fees, flat fees, or other 15    service charges; and16        (7) shall make publicly available on its website, 17    without the need for a customer login, rate information 18    for all of its variable, time-of-use, and fixed rate 19    contracts currently available to residential customers, 20    including but not limited to, fixed monthly charges, early 21    termination fees, and per therm charges. 22    (c) An alternative gas supplier shall not submit or 23execute a change in a customer's selection of a natural gas 24provider unless and until (i) the alternative gas supplier 25first discloses all material terms and conditions of the 26offer, including price, to the customer; (ii) the alternative   HB1284- 21 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1gas supplier has obtained the customer's express agreement to 2accept the offer after the disclosure of all material terms 3and conditions of the offer; and (iii) the alternative gas 4supplier has confirmed the request for a change in accordance 5with one of the following procedures: 6        (1) The alternative gas supplier has obtained the 7    customer's written or electronically signed authorization 8    in a form that meets the following requirements: 9            (A) An alternative gas supplier shall obtain any 10        necessary written or electronically signed 11        authorization from a customer for a change in natural 12        gas service by using a letter of agency as specified in 13        this Section. Any letter of agency that does not 14        conform with this Section is invalid.15            (B) The letter of agency shall be a separate 16        document (or an easily separable document containing 17        only the authorization language described in item (E) 18        of this paragraph (1)) whose sole purpose is to 19        authorize a natural gas provider change. The letter of 20        agency must be signed and dated by the customer 21        requesting the natural gas provider change.22            (C) The letter of agency shall not be combined 23        with inducements of any kind on the same document.24            (D) Notwithstanding items (A) and (B) of this 25        paragraph (1), the letter of agency may be combined 26        with checks that contain only the required letter of   HB1284- 22 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        agency language prescribed in item (E) of this 2        paragraph (1) and the necessary information to make 3        the check a negotiable instrument. The letter of 4        agency check shall not contain any promotional 5        language or material. The letter of agency check shall 6        contain in easily readable, bold face type on the face 7        of the check a notice that the consumer is authorizing 8        a natural gas provider change by signing the check. 9        The letter of agency language also shall be placed 10        near the signature line on the back of the check.11            (E) At a minimum, the letter of agency must be 12        printed with a print of sufficient size to be clearly 13        legible and must contain clear and unambiguous 14        language that confirms:15                (i) the customer's billing name and address;16                (ii) the decision to change the natural gas 17            provider from the current provider to the 18            prospective alternative gas supplier;19                (iii) the terms, conditions, and nature of the 20            service to be provided to the customer, including, 21            but not limited to, the rates for the service 22            contracted for by the customer; and23                (iv) that the customer understands that any 24            natural gas provider selection the customer 25            chooses may involve a charge to the customer for 26            changing the customer's natural gas provider.   HB1284- 23 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1            (F) Letters of agency shall not suggest or require 2        that a customer take some action in order to retain the 3        customer's current natural gas provider.4            (G) If any portion of a letter of agency is 5        translated into another language, then all portions of 6        the letter of agency must be translated into that 7        language. 8        (2) An appropriately qualified independent third party 9    has obtained, in accordance with the procedures set forth 10    in this paragraph (2), the customer's oral authorization 11    to change natural gas providers that confirms and includes 12    appropriate verification data. The independent third party 13    must (i) not be owned, managed, controlled, or directed by 14    the alternative gas supplier or the alternative gas 15    supplier's marketing agent; (ii) not have any financial 16    incentive to confirm provider change requests for the 17    alternative gas supplier or the alternative gas supplier's 18    marketing agent; and (iii) operate in a location 19    physically separate from the alternative gas supplier or 20    the alternative gas supplier's marketing agent. Automated 21    third-party verification systems and 3-way conference 22    calls may be used for verification purposes so long as the 23    other requirements of this paragraph (2) are satisfied. An 24    alternative gas supplier or alternative gas supplier's 25    sales representative initiating a 3-way conference call or 26    a call through an automated verification system must drop   HB1284- 24 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    off the call once the 3-way connection has been 2    established. All third-party verification methods shall 3    elicit, at a minimum, the following information: 4            (A) the identity of the customer;5            (B) confirmation that the person on the call is 6        authorized to make the provider change;7            (C) confirmation that the person on the call wants 8        to make the provider change;9            (D) the names of the providers affected by the 10        change;11            (E) the service address of the service to be 12        switched; and13            (F) the price of the service to be provided and the 14        material terms and conditions of the service being 15        offered, including whether any early termination fees 16        apply.17        Third-party verifiers may not market the alternative 18    gas supplier's services by providing additional 19    information. All third-party verifications shall be 20    conducted in the same language that was used in the 21    underlying sales transaction and shall be recorded in 22    their entirety. Submitting alternative gas suppliers shall 23    maintain and preserve audio records of verification of 24    customer authorization for a minimum period of 2 years 25    after obtaining the verification. Automated systems must 26    provide customers with an option to speak with a live   HB1284- 25 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    person at any time during the call. 2        (3) The alternative gas supplier has obtained the 3    customer's authorization via an automated verification 4    system to change natural gas service via telephone. An 5    automated verification system is an electronic system 6    that, through pre-recorded prompts, elicits voice 7    responses, touchtone responses, or both, from the customer 8    and records both the prompts and the customer's responses. 9    Such authorization must elicit the information in 10    paragraph (2)(A) through (F) of this subsection (c). 11    Alternative gas suppliers electing to confirm sales 12    electronically through an automated verification system 13    shall establish one or more toll-free telephone numbers 14    exclusively for that purpose. Calls to the number or 15    numbers shall connect a customer to a voice response unit, 16    or similar mechanism, that makes a date-stamped, 17    time-stamped recording of the required information 18    regarding the alternative gas supplier change.19        The alternative gas supplier shall not use such 20    electronic authorization systems to market its services.21        (4) When a consumer initiates the call to the 22    prospective alternative gas supplier, in order to enroll 23    the consumer as a customer, the prospective alternative 24    gas supplier must, with the consent of the customer, make 25    a date-stamped, time-stamped audio recording that elicits, 26    at a minimum, the following information:   HB1284- 26 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1            (A) the identity of the customer;2            (B) confirmation that the person on the call is 3        authorized to make the provider change;4            (C) confirmation that the person on the call wants 5        to make the provider change;6            (D) the names of the providers affected by the 7        change;8            (E) the service address of the service to be 9        switched; and10            (F) the price of the service to be supplied and the 11        material terms and conditions of the service being 12        offered, including whether any early termination fees 13        apply.14        Submitting alternative gas suppliers shall maintain 15    and preserve the audio records containing the information 16    set forth above for a minimum period of 2 years. 17        (5) In the event that a customer enrolls for service 18    from an alternative gas supplier via an Internet website, 19    the alternative gas supplier shall obtain an 20    electronically signed letter of agency in accordance with 21    paragraph (1) of this subsection (c) and any customer 22    information shall be protected in accordance with all 23    applicable statutes and regulations. In addition, an 24    alternative gas supplier shall provide the following when 25    marketing via an Internet website:26            (A) The Internet enrollment website shall, at a   HB1284- 27 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        minimum, include:2                (i) a copy of the alternative gas supplier's 3            customer contract that clearly and conspicuously 4            discloses all terms and conditions; and5                (ii) a conspicuous prompt for the customer to 6            print or save a copy of the contract. 7            (B) Any electronic version of the contract shall 8        be identified by version number, in order to ensure 9        the ability to verify the particular contract to which 10        the customer assents.11            (C) Throughout the duration of the alternative gas 12        supplier's contract with a customer, the alternative 13        gas supplier shall retain and, within 3 business days 14        of the customer's request, provide to the customer an 15        e-mail, paper, or facsimile of the terms and 16        conditions of the numbered contract version to which 17        the customer assents.18            (D) The alternative gas supplier shall provide a 19        mechanism by which both the submission and receipt of 20        the electronic letter of agency are recorded by time 21        and date.22            (E) After the customer completes the electronic 23        letter of agency, the alternative gas supplier shall 24        disclose conspicuously through its website that the 25        customer has been enrolled, and the alternative gas 26        supplier shall provide the customer an enrollment   HB1284- 28 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        confirmation number.2        (6) When a customer is solicited in person by the 3    alternative gas supplier's sales agent, the alternative 4    gas supplier may only obtain the customer's authorization 5    to change natural gas service through the method provided 6    for in paragraph (2) of this subsection (c).7    Alternative gas suppliers must be in compliance with this 8subsection (c) within 90 days after the effective date of this 9amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly. 10    (d) Complaints may be filed with the Commission under this 11Section by a customer whose natural gas service has been 12provided by an alternative gas supplier in a manner not in 13compliance with subsection (c) of this Section. If, after 14notice and hearing, the Commission finds that an alternative 15gas supplier has violated subsection (c), then the Commission 16may in its discretion do any one or more of the following:17        (1) Require the violating alternative gas supplier to 18    refund the customer charges collected in excess of those 19    that would have been charged by the customer's authorized 20    natural gas provider.21        (2) Require the violating alternative gas supplier to 22    pay to the customer's authorized natural gas provider the 23    amount the authorized natural gas provider would have 24    collected for natural gas service. The Commission is 25    authorized to reduce this payment by any amount already 26    paid by the violating alternative gas supplier to the   HB1284- 29 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    customer's authorized natural gas provider.2        (3) Require the violating alternative gas supplier to 3    pay a fine of up to $1,000 into the Public Utility Fund for 4    each repeated and intentional violation of this Section.5        (4) Issue a cease and desist order.6        (5) For a pattern of violation of this Section or for 7    intentionally violating a cease and desist order, revoke 8    the violating alternative gas supplier's certificate of 9    service authority. 10    (e) No alternative gas supplier shall:11        (1) enter into or employ any arrangements which have 12    the effect of preventing any customer from having access 13    to the services of the gas utility in whose service area 14    the customer is located; 15        (2) charge customers for such access;16        (3) bill for goods or services not authorized by the 17    customer; or18        (4) bill for a disputed amount where the alternative 19    gas supplier has been provided notice of such dispute. The 20    supplier shall attempt to resolve a dispute with the 21    customer. When the dispute is not resolved to the 22    customer's satisfaction, the supplier shall inform the 23    customer of the right to file an informal complaint with 24    the Commission and provide contact information. While the 25    pending dispute is active at the Commission, an 26    alternative gas supplier may bill only for the undisputed   HB1284- 30 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    amount until the Commission has taken final action on the 2    complaint. 3    (f) An alternative gas supplier that is certified to serve 4residential or small commercial customers shall not:5        (1) deny service to a customer or group of customers 6    nor establish any differences as to prices, terms, 7    conditions, services, products, facilities, or in any 8    other respect, whereby such denial or differences are 9    based upon race, gender, or income, except as provided in 10    Section 19-116;11        (2) deny service based on locality, nor establish any 12    unreasonable difference as to prices, terms, conditions, 13    services, products, or facilities as between localities;14        (3) include in any agreement a provision that 15    obligates a customer to the terms of the agreement if the 16    customer (i) moves outside the State of Illinois; (ii) 17    moves to a location without a transportation service 18    program; or (iii) moves to a location where the customer 19    will not require natural gas service, provided that 20    nothing in this subsection precludes an alternative gas 21    supplier from taking any action otherwise available to it 22    to collect a debt that arises out of service provided to 23    the customer before the customer moved; or24        (4) assign the agreement to any alternative natural 25    gas supplier, unless:26            (A) the supplier is an alternative gas supplier   HB1284- 31 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        certified by the Commission;2            (B) the rates, terms, and conditions of the 3        agreement being assigned do not change during the 4        remainder of the time covered by the agreement;5            (C) the customer is given no less than 30 days 6        prior written notice of the assignment and contact 7        information for the new supplier; and8            (D) the supplier assigning the contract provides 9        contact information that a customer can use to resolve 10        a dispute; or . 11        (5) pay a commission or other incentive-based 12    compensation to individuals or agents engaged in in-person 13    solicitation or telemarketing. 14    (g) An alternative gas supplier shall comply with the 15following requirements with respect to the marketing, 16offering, and provision of products or services:17        (1) All marketing materials, including, but not 18    limited to, electronic marketing materials, in-person 19    solicitations, and telephone solicitations, concerning 20    prices, terms, and conditions of service shall contain 21    information that adequately discloses the prices, terms, 22    and conditions of the products or services and shall 23    disclose the utility gas supply cost rates per therm price 24    available from the Illinois Commerce Commission website 25    applicable at the time the alternative gas supplier is 26    offering or selling the products or services to the   HB1284- 32 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    customer and shall disclose the date on which the utility 2    gas supply cost rates per therm became effective and the 3    date on which they will expire. All marketing materials, 4    including, but not limited to, electronic marketing 5    materials, in-person solicitations, and telephone 6    solicitations, shall include the following statement:7            "(Name of the alternative gas supplier) is not the 8        same entity as your gas delivery company. You are not 9        required to enroll with (name of alternative gas 10        supplier). Beginning on (effective date), the utility 11        gas supply cost rate per therm is (cost). The utility 12        gas supply cost will expire on (expiration date). For 13        more information go to the Illinois Commerce 14        Commission's free website at 15        www.icc.illinois.gov/ags/consumereducation.aspx.".16        This paragraph (1) does not apply to goodwill or 17    institutional advertising. 18        (2) Before any customer is switched from another 19    supplier, the alternative gas supplier shall give the 20    customer written information that clearly and 21    conspicuously discloses, in plain language, the prices, 22    terms, and conditions of the products and services being 23    offered and sold to the customer. This written information 24    shall be provided in a language in which the customer 25    subject to the marketing or solicitation is able to 26    understand and communicate, and the alternative gas   HB1284- 33 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    supplier shall not switch a customer who is unable to 2    understand and communicate in a language in which the 3    marketing or solicitation was conducted. The alternative 4    gas supplier shall comply with Section 2N of the Consumer 5    Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. Nothing in 6    this paragraph (2) may be read to relieve an alternative 7    gas supplier from the duties imposed on it by item (3) of 8    subsection (c) of Section 2DDD of the Consumer Fraud and 9    Deceptive Business Practices Act. 10        (3) The alternative gas supplier shall provide to the 11    customer:12            (A) accurate, timely, and itemized billing 13        statements that describe the products and services 14        provided to the customer and their prices and that 15        specify the gas consumption amount and any service 16        charges and taxes; provided that this item (g)(3)(A) 17        does not apply to small commercial customers;18            (B) billing statements that clearly and 19        conspicuously discloses the name and contact 20        information for the alternative gas supplier;21            (C) an additional statement, at least annually, 22        that adequately discloses the average monthly prices, 23        and the terms and conditions, of the products and 24        services sold to the customer; provided that this item 25        (g)(3)(C) does not apply to small commercial 26        customers;  HB1284- 34 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1            (D) refunds of any deposits with interest within 2        30 days after the date that the customer changes gas 3        suppliers or discontinues service if the customer has 4        satisfied all of his or her outstanding financial 5        obligations to the alternative gas supplier at an 6        interest rate set by the Commission which shall be the 7        same as that required of gas utilities; and8            (E) refunds, in a timely fashion, of all 9        undisputed overpayments upon the oral or written 10        request of the customer.11        (4) An alternative gas supplier and its sales agents 12    shall refrain from any direct marketing or soliciting to 13    consumers on the gas utility's "Do Not Contact List", 14    which the alternative gas supplier shall obtain on the 15    15th calendar day of the month from the gas utility in 16    whose service area the consumer is provided with gas 17    service. If the 15th calendar day is a non-business day, 18    then the alternative gas supplier shall obtain the list on 19    the next business day following the 15th calendar day of 20    that month.21        (5) Early Termination.22            (A) Any agreement that contains an early 23        termination clause shall disclose the amount of the 24        early termination fee, provided that any early 25        termination fee or penalty shall not exceed $50 total, 26        regardless of whether or not the agreement is a   HB1284- 35 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        multiyear agreement.2            (B) In any agreement that contains an early 3        termination clause, an alternative gas supplier shall 4        provide the customer the opportunity to terminate the 5        agreement without any termination fee or penalty 6        within 10 business days after the date of the first 7        bill issued to the customer for products or services 8        provided by the alternative gas supplier. The 9        agreement shall disclose the opportunity and provide a 10        toll-free phone number that the customer may call in 11        order to terminate the agreement. Beginning January 1, 12        2020, residential and small commercial customers shall 13        have a right to terminate their agreements with 14        alternative gas suppliers at any time without any 15        termination fees or penalties. 16        (6) Within 2 business days after electronic receipt of 17    a customer switch from the alternative gas supplier and 18    confirmation of eligibility, the gas utility shall provide 19    the customer written notice confirming the switch. The gas 20    utility shall not switch the service until 10 business 21    days after the date on the notice to the customer.22        (7) The alternative gas supplier shall provide each 23    customer the opportunity to rescind its agreement without 24    penalty within 10 business days after the date on the gas 25    utility notice to the customer. The alternative gas 26    supplier shall disclose all of the following:   HB1284- 36 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1            (A) that the gas utility shall send a notice 2        confirming the switch;3            (B) that from the date the utility issues the 4        notice confirming the switch, the customer shall have 5        10 business days to rescind the switch without 6        penalty;7            (C) that the customer shall contact the gas 8        utility or the alternative gas supplier to rescind the 9        switch; and10            (D) the contact information for the gas utility.11        The alternative gas supplier disclosure shall be 12    included in its sales solicitations, contracts, and all 13    applicable sales verification scripts. 14        (8) All in-person and telephone solicitations shall be 15    conducted in, translated into, and provided in a language 16    in which the consumer subject to the marketing or 17    solicitation is able to understand and communicate. An 18    alternative gas supplier shall terminate a solicitation if 19    the consumer subject to the marketing or communication is 20    unable to understand and communicate in the language in 21    which the marketing or solicitation is being conducted. An 22    alternative gas supplier shall comply with Section 2N of 23    the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. 24    (h) An alternative gas supplier may limit the overall size 25or availability of a service offering by specifying one or 26more of the following:  HB1284- 37 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        (1) a maximum number of customers and maximum amount 2    of gas load to be served;3        (2) time period during which the offering will be 4    available; or5        (3) other comparable limitation, but not including the 6    geographic locations of customers within the area which 7    the alternative gas supplier is certificated to serve.8    The alternative gas supplier shall file the terms and 9conditions of such service offering including the applicable 10limitations with the Commission prior to making the service 11offering available to customers.12    (i) Nothing in this Section shall be construed as 13preventing an alternative gas supplier that is an affiliate 14of, or which contracts with, (i) an industry or trade 15organization or association, (ii) a membership organization or 16association that exists for a purpose other than the purchase 17of gas, or (iii) another organization that meets criteria 18established in a rule adopted by the Commission from offering 19through the organization or association services at prices, 20terms and conditions that are available solely to the members 21of the organization or association.22(Source: P.A. 101-590, eff. 1-1-20; 102-459, eff. 8-20-21.) 23    Section 10. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 24Practices Act is amended by changing Sections 2EE and 2DDD as 25follows:   HB1284- 38 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    (815 ILCS 505/2EE)2    Sec. 2EE. Alternative retail electric supplier selection. 3    (a) An alternative retail electric supplier shall not 4submit or execute a change in a consumer's selection of a 5provider of electric service unless and until:6        (i) the alternative retail electric supplier first 7    discloses all material terms and conditions of the offer 8    to the consumer;9        (ii) if the consumer is a small commercial retail 10    customer as that term is defined in subsection (c) of this 11    Section or a residential consumer, the alternative retail 12    electric supplier discloses the utility electric supply 13    price to compare, which shall be the sum of the electric 14    supply charge and the transmission services charge, and 15    shall not include the purchased electricity adjustment, 16    applicable at the time the offer is made to the consumer;17        (iii) if the consumer is a small commercial retail 18    customer as that term is defined in subsection (c) of this 19    Section or a residential consumer, the alternative retail 20    electric provider discloses the following statement:21            "(Name of the alternative retail electric 22        supplier) is not the same entity as your electric 23        delivery company. You are not required to enroll with 24        (name of alternative retail electric supplier). As of 25        (effective date), the electric supply price to compare   HB1284- 39 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        is currently (price in cents per kilowatt hour). The 2        electric utility electric supply price will expire on 3        (expiration date). The utility electric supply price 4        to compare does not include the purchased electricity 5        adjustment factor. For more information go to the 6        Illinois Commerce Commission's free website at 7        www.pluginillinois.org.".8        If applicable, the statement shall include the 9    following statement:10            "The purchased electricity adjustment factor may 11        range between +.5 cents and -.5 cents per kilowatt 12        hour."; 13        (iv) the alternative retail electric supplier has 14    obtained the consumer's express agreement to accept the 15    offer after the disclosure of all material terms and 16    conditions of the offer; and17        (v) the alternative retail electric supplier has 18    confirmed the request for a change in accordance with one 19    of the following procedures:20            (A) The new alternative retail electric supplier 21        has obtained the consumer's written or electronically 22        signed authorization in a form that meets the 23        following requirements:24                (1) An alternative retail electric supplier 25            shall obtain any necessary written or 26            electronically signed authorization from a   HB1284- 40 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1            consumer for a change in electric service by using 2            a letter of agency as specified in this Section. 3            Any letter of agency that does not conform with 4            this Section is invalid.5                (2) The letter of agency shall be a separate 6            document (an easily separable document containing 7            only the authorization language described in 8            subparagraph (5)) whose sole purpose is to 9            authorize an electric service provider change. The 10            letter of agency must be signed and dated by the 11            consumer requesting the electric service provider 12            change.13                (3) The letter of agency shall not be combined 14            with inducements of any kind on the same document.15                (4) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (1) and (2), 16            the letter of agency may be combined with checks 17            that contain only the required letter of agency 18            language prescribed in subparagraph (5) and the 19            necessary information to make the check a 20            negotiable instrument. The letter of agency check 21            shall not contain any promotional language or 22            material. The letter of agency check shall contain 23            in easily readable, bold-face type on the face of 24            the check, a notice that the consumer is 25            authorizing an electric service provider change by 26            signing the check. The letter of agency language   HB1284- 41 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1            also shall be placed near the signature line on 2            the back of the check.3                (5) At a minimum, the letter of agency must be 4            printed with a print of sufficient size to be 5            clearly legible, and must contain clear and 6            unambiguous language that confirms:7                    (i) The consumer's billing name and 8                address;9                    (ii) The decision to change the electric 10                service provider from the current provider to 11                the prospective provider;12                    (iii) The terms, conditions, and nature of 13                the service to be provided to the consumer 14                must be clearly and conspicuously disclosed, 15                in writing, and an alternative retail electric 16                supplier must directly establish the rates for 17                the service contracted for by the consumer; 18                and19                    (iv) That the consumer understand that any 20                alternative retail electric supplier selection 21                the consumer chooses may involve a charge to 22                the consumer for changing the consumer's 23                electric service provider.24                (6) Letters of agency shall not suggest or 25            require that a consumer take some action in order 26            to retain the consumer's current electric service   HB1284- 42 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1            provider.2                (7) If any portion of a letter of agency is 3            translated into another language, then all 4            portions of the letter of agency must be 5            translated into that language.6            (B) An appropriately qualified independent third 7        party has obtained, in accordance with the procedures 8        set forth in this subsection (b), the consumer's oral 9        authorization to change electric suppliers that 10        confirms and includes appropriate verification data. 11        The independent third party (i) must not be owned, 12        managed, controlled, or directed by the supplier or 13        the supplier's marketing agent; (ii) must not have any 14        financial incentive to confirm supplier change 15        requests for the supplier or the supplier's marketing 16        agent; and (iii) must operate in a location physically 17        separate from the supplier or the supplier's marketing 18        agent. 19            Automated third-party verification systems and 20        3-way conference calls may be used for verification 21        purposes so long as the other requirements of this 22        subsection (b) are satisfied.23            A supplier or supplier's sales representative 24        initiating a 3-way conference call or a call through 25        an automated verification system must drop off the 26        call once the 3-way connection has been established.  HB1284- 43 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1            All third-party verification methods shall elicit, 2        at a minimum, the following information: (i) the 3        identity of the consumer; (ii) confirmation that the 4        person on the call is the account holder, has been 5        specifically and explicitly authorized by the account 6        holder, or possesses lawful authority to make the 7        supplier change; (iii) confirmation that the person on 8        the call wants to make the supplier change; (iv) the 9        names of the suppliers affected by the change; (v) the 10        service address of the supply to be switched; and (vi) 11        the price of the service to be supplied and the 12        material terms and conditions of the service being 13        offered, including whether any early termination fees 14        apply. Third-party verifiers may not market the 15        supplier's services by providing additional 16        information, including information regarding 17        procedures to block or otherwise freeze an account 18        against further changes.19            All third-party verifications shall be conducted 20        in the same language that was used in the underlying 21        sales transaction and shall be recorded in their 22        entirety. Submitting suppliers shall maintain and 23        preserve audio records of verification of subscriber 24        authorization for a minimum period of 2 years after 25        obtaining the verification. Automated systems must 26        provide consumers with an option to speak with a live   HB1284- 44 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        person at any time during the call. Each disclosure 2        made during the third-party verification must be made 3        individually to obtain clear acknowledgment of each 4        disclosure. The alternative retail electric supplier 5        must be in a location where he or she cannot hear the 6        customer while the third-party verification is 7        conducted. The alternative retail electric supplier 8        shall not contact the customer after the third-party 9        verification for a period of 24 hours unless the 10        customer initiates the contact. 11            (C) When a consumer initiates the call to the 12        prospective alternative retail electric supplier, in 13        order to enroll the consumer as a customer, the 14        prospective alternative retail electric supplier must, 15        with the consent of the customer, make a date-stamped, 16        time-stamped audio recording that elicits, at a 17        minimum, the following information:18                (1) the identity of the customer;19                (2) confirmation that the person on the call 20            is authorized to make the supplier change;21                (3) confirmation that the person on the call 22            wants to make the supplier change;23                (4) the names of the suppliers affected by the 24            change;25                (5) the service address of the supply to be 26            switched; and  HB1284- 45 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1                (6) the price of the service to be supplied 2            and the material terms and conditions of the 3            service being offered, including whether any early 4            termination fees apply. 5            Submitting suppliers shall maintain and preserve 6        the audio records containing the information set forth 7        above for a minimum period of 2 years. 8    (b)(1) An alternative retail electric supplier shall not 9utilize the name of a public utility in any manner that is 10deceptive or misleading, including, but not limited to, 11implying or otherwise leading a consumer to believe that an 12alternative retail electric supplier is soliciting on behalf 13of or is an agent of a utility. An alternative retail electric 14supplier shall not utilize the name, or any other identifying 15insignia, graphics, or wording that has been used at any time 16to represent a public utility company or its services, to 17identify, label, or define any of its electric power and 18energy service offers. An alternative retail electric supplier 19may state the name of a public electric utility in order to 20accurately describe the electric utility service territories 21in which the supplier is currently offering an electric power 22and energy service. An alternative retail electric supplier 23that is the affiliate of an Illinois public utility and that 24was doing business in Illinois providing alternative retail 25electric service on January 1, 2016 may continue to use that 26public utility's name, logo, identifying insignia, graphics,   HB1284- 46 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1or wording in its business operations occurring outside the 2service territory of the public utility with which it is 3affiliated.4    (2) An alternative retail electric supplier shall not 5state or otherwise imply that the alternative retail electric 6supplier is employed by, representing, endorsed by, or acting 7on behalf of a utility or utility program, a consumer group or 8consumer group program, or a governmental body, unless the 9alternative retail electric supplier has entered into a 10contractual arrangement with the governmental body and has 11been authorized by the governmental body to make the 12statements.13    (c) An alternative retail electric supplier shall not 14submit or execute a change in a consumer's selection of a 15provider of electric service unless the alternative retail 16electric supplier complies with the following requirements of 17this subsection (c). It is a violation of this Section for an 18alternative retail electric supplier to fail to comply with 19this subsection (c). The requirements of this subsection (c) 20shall only apply to residential and small commercial retail 21customers. For purposes of this subsection (c) only, "small 22commercial retail customer" has the meaning given to that term 23in Section 16-102 of the Public Utilities Act.24        (1) During a solicitation an alternative retail 25    electric supplier shall state that he or represents an 26    independent seller of electric power and energy service   HB1284- 47 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    certified by the Illinois Commerce Commission and that he 2    or she is not employed by, representing, endorsed by, or 3    acting on behalf of, a utility, or a utility program, a 4    consumer group or consumer group program, or a 5    governmental body, unless the alternative retail electric 6    supplier has entered into a contractual arrangement with 7    the governmental body and has been authorized with the 8    governmental body to make the statements.9        (2) Alternative retail electric suppliers who engage 10    in in-person solicitation for the purpose of selling 11    electric power and energy service offered by the 12    alternative retail electric supplier shall display 13    identification on an outer garment. This identification 14    shall be visible at all times and prominently display the 15    following: (i) the alternative retail electric supplier 16    agent's full name in reasonable size font; (ii) an agent 17    identification number; (iii) a photograph of the 18    alternative retail electric supplier agent; and (iv) the 19    trade name and logo of the alternative retail electric 20    supplier the agent is representing. If the agent is 21    selling electric power and energy services from multiple 22    alternative retail electric suppliers to the consumer, the 23    identification shall display the trade name and logo of 24    the agent, broker, or consultant entity as that entity is 25    defined in Section 16-115C of the Public Utilities Act. An 26    alternative retail electric supplier shall leave the   HB1284- 48 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    premises at the consumer's, owner's, or occupant's 2    request. A copy of the Uniform Disclosure Statement 3    described in 83 Ill. Adm. Code 412.115 and 412.Appendix A 4    is to be left with the consumer, at the conclusion of the 5    visit unless the consumer refuses to accept a copy. An 6    alternative retail electric supplier may provide the 7    Uniform Disclosure Statement electronically instead of in 8    paper form to a consumer upon that customer's request. The 9    alternative retail electric supplier shall also offer to 10    the consumer, at the time of the initiation of the 11    solicitation, a business card or other material that lists 12    the agent's name, identification number and title, and the 13    alternative retail electric supplier's name and contact 14    information, including phone number. The alternative 15    retail electric supplier shall not conduct any in-person 16    solicitations of consumers at any building or premises 17    where any sign, notice, or declaration of any description 18    whatsoever is posted that prohibits sales, marketing, or 19    solicitations. The alternative retail electric supplier 20    shall obtain consent to enter multi-unit residential 21    dwellings. Consent obtained to enter a multi-unit dwelling 22    from one prospective customer or occupant of the dwelling 23    shall not constitute consent to market to any other 24    prospective consumers without separate consent.25        (3) An alternative retail electric supplier who 26    contacts consumers by telephone for the purpose of selling   HB1284- 49 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    electric power and energy service shall provide the 2    agent's name and identification number. Any telemarketing 3    solicitations that lead to a telephone enrollment of a 4    consumer must be recorded and retained for a minimum of 2 5    years. All telemarketing calls of consumers that do not 6    lead to a telephone enrollment, but last at least 2 7    minutes, shall be recorded and retained for a minimum of 6 8    months.9        (4) During an inbound enrollment call, an alternative 10    retail electric supplier shall state that he or she 11    represents an independent seller of electric power and 12    energy service certified by the Illinois Commerce 13    Commission. All inbound enrollment calls that lead to an 14    enrollment shall be recorded, and the recordings shall be 15    retained for a minimum of 2 years. An inbound enrollment 16    call that does not lead to an enrollment, but lasts at 17    least 2 minutes, shall be retained for a minimum of 6 18    months. The alternative retail electric supplier shall 19    send the Uniform Disclosure Statement and contract to the 20    customer within 3 business days after the electric 21    utility's confirmation to the alternative retail electric 22    supplier of an accepted enrollment.23        (5) If a direct mail solicitation to a consumer 24    includes a written letter of agency, it shall include the 25    Uniform Disclosure Statement described in 83 Ill. Adm. 26    Code 412.115 and 412.Appendix A. The Uniform Disclosure   HB1284- 50 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    Statement shall be provided on a separate page from the 2    other marketing materials included in the direct mail 3    solicitation. If a written letter of agency is being used 4    to authorize a consumer's enrollment, the written letter 5    of agency shall comply with this Section. A copy of the 6    contract must be sent to the consumer within 3 business 7    days after the electric utility's confirmation to the 8    alternative retail electric supplier of an accepted 9    enrollment.10        (6) Online Solicitation.11            (A) Each alternative retail electric supplier 12        offering electric power and energy service to 13        consumers online shall clearly and conspicuously make 14        all disclosures for any services offered through 15        online enrollment before requiring the consumer to 16        enter any personal information other than zip code, 17        electric utility service territory, or type of service 18        sought.19            (B) Notwithstanding any requirements in this 20        Section to the contrary, an alternative retail 21        electric supplier may secure consent from the consumer 22        to obtain customer-specific billing and usage 23        information for the sole purpose of determining and 24        pricing a product through a letter of agency or method 25        approved through an Illinois Commerce Commission 26        docket before making all disclosure for services   HB1284- 51 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        offered through online enrollment. It is a violation 2        of this Act for an alternative retail electric 3        supplier to use a consumer's utility account number to 4        execute or change a consumer's enrollment unless the 5        consumer expressly consents to that enrollment as 6        required by law.7            (C) The enrollment website of the alternative 8        retail electric supplier shall, at a minimum, include: 9        (i) disclosure of all material terms and conditions of 10        the offer; (ii) a statement that electronic acceptance 11        of the terms and conditions is an agreement to 12        initiate service and begin enrollment; (iii) a 13        statement that the consumer shall review the contract 14        or contact the current supplier to learn if any early 15        termination fees are applicable; and (iv) an email 16        address and toll-free phone number of the alternative 17        retail electric supplier where the customer can 18        express a decision to rescind the contract.19        (7)(A) Beginning January 1, 2020, an alternative 20    retail electric supplier shall not sell or offer to sell 21    any products or services to a consumer pursuant to a 22    contract in which the contract automatically renews, 23    unless an alternative retail electric supplier provides to 24    the consumer at the outset of the offer, in addition to 25    other disclosures required by law, a separate written 26    statement titled "Automatic Contract Renewal" that clearly   HB1284- 52 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    and conspicuously discloses in bold lettering in at least 2    12-point font the terms and conditions of the automatic 3    contract renewal provision, including: (i) the estimated 4    bill cycle on which the initial contract term expires and 5    a statement that it could be later based on when the 6    utility accepts the initial enrollment; (ii) the estimated 7    bill cycle on which the new contract term begins and a 8    statement that it will immediately follow the last billing 9    cycle of the current term; (iii) the procedure to 10    terminate the contract before the new contract term 11    applies; and (iv) the cancellation procedure. If the 12    alternative retail electric supplier sells or offers to 13    sell the products or services to a consumer during an 14    in-person solicitation or telemarketing solicitation, the 15    disclosures described in this subparagraph (A) shall also 16    be made to the consumer verbally during the solicitation. 17    Nothing in this subparagraph (A) shall be construed to 18    apply to contracts entered into before January 1, 2020.19        (B) At least 30 days before, but not more than 60 days 20    prior, to the end of the initial contract term, in any and 21    all contracts that automatically renew after the initial 22    term, the alternative retail electric supplier shall send, 23    in addition to other disclosures required by law, a 24    separate written notice of the contract renewal to the 25    consumer that clearly and conspicuously discloses the 26    following:  HB1284- 53 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1            (i) a statement printed or visible from the 2        outside of the envelope or in the subject line of the 3        email, if the customer has agreed to receive official 4        documents by email, that states "Contract Renewal 5        Notice";6            (ii) a statement in bold lettering, in at least 7        12-point font, that the contract will automatically 8        renew unless the customer cancels it;9            (iii) the billing cycle in which service under the 10        current term will expire;11            (iv) the billing cycle in which service under the 12        new term will begin;13            (v) the process and options available to the 14        consumer to reject the new contract terms;15            (vi) the cancellation process if the consumer's 16        contract automatically renews before the consumer 17        rejects the new contract terms;18            (vii) the terms and conditions of the new contract 19        term;20            (viii) for a fixed rate contract, a side-by-side 21        comparison of the current price and the new price; for 22        a variable rate contract or time-of-use product in 23        which the first month's renewal price can be 24        determined, a side-by-side comparison of the current 25        price and the price for the first month of the new 26        variable or time-of-use price; or for a variable or   HB1284- 54 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        time-of-use contract based on a publicly available 2        index, a side-by-side comparison of the current 3        formula and the new formula; and 4            (ix) the phone number and Internet address to 5        submit a consumer inquiry or complaint to the Illinois 6        Commerce Commission and the Office of the Attorney 7        General. 8        (C) An alternative retail electric supplier shall not 9    automatically renew a consumer's enrollment after the 10    current term of the contract expires when the current term 11    of the contract provides that the consumer will be charged 12    a fixed rate and the renewed contract provides that the 13    consumer will be charged a variable rate, unless: (i) the 14    alternative retail electric supplier complies with 15    subparagraphs (A) and (B); and (ii) the customer expressly 16    consents to the contract renewal in writing or by 17    electronic signature at least 30 days, but no more than 60 18    days, before the contract expires.19        (D) An alternative retail electric supplier shall not 20    automatically renew a consumer's enrollment after the 21    current term of the contract expires when the renewed 22    contract provides that the consumer will be charged a rate 23    higher than the current contract rate unless: (i) the 24    alternative retail electric supplier complies with 25    subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph (7); and (ii) 26    the customer expressly consents to the contract renewal in   HB1284- 55 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    writing or by electronic signature at least 30 days, but 2    no more than 60 days, before the contract expires. 3        (E) (D) This paragraph (7) does not apply to customers 4    enrolled in a municipal aggregation program pursuant to 5    Section 1-92 of the Illinois Power Agency Act. 6        (8) All in-person and telephone solicitations shall be 7    conducted in, translated into, and provided in a language 8    in which the consumer subject to the marketing or 9    solicitation is able to understand and communicate. An 10    alternative retail electric supplier shall terminate a 11    solicitation if the consumer subject to the marketing or 12    communication is unable to understand and communicate in 13    the language in which the marketing or solicitation is 14    being conducted. An alternative retail electric supplier 15    shall comply with Section 2N of this Act.16        (9) Beginning January 1, 2020, consumers shall have 17    the right to terminate their contract with the alternative 18    retail electric supplier at any time without any 19    termination fees or penalties.20        (10) An alternative retail electric supplier shall not 21    submit a change to a customer's electric service provider 22    in violation of Section 16-115E of the Public Utilities 23    Act. 24    (d) Complaints may be filed with the Illinois Commerce 25Commission under this Section by a consumer whose electric 26service has been provided by an alternative retail electric   HB1284- 56 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1supplier in a manner not in compliance with this Section or by 2the Illinois Commerce Commission on its own motion when it 3appears to the Commission that an alternative retail electric 4supplier has provided service in a manner not in compliance 5with this Section. If, after notice and hearing, the 6Commission finds that an alternative retail electric supplier 7has violated this Section, the Commission may in its 8discretion do any one or more of the following:9        (1) Require the violating alternative retail electric 10    supplier to refund to the consumer charges collected in 11    excess of those that would have been charged by the 12    consumer's authorized electric service provider.13        (2) Require the violating alternative retail electric 14    supplier to pay to the consumer's authorized electric 15    service provider the amount the authorized electric 16    service provider would have collected for the electric 17    service. The Commission is authorized to reduce this 18    payment by any amount already paid by the violating 19    alternative retail electric supplier to the consumer's 20    authorized provider for electric service.21        (3) Require the violating alternative retail electric 22    supplier to pay a fine of up to $10,000 into the Public 23    Utility Fund for each violation of this Section.24        (4) Issue a cease and desist order.25        (5) For a pattern of violation of this Section or for 26    violations that continue after a cease and desist order,   HB1284- 57 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    revoke the violating alternative retail electric 2    supplier's certificate of service authority. 3    (d-5)(1) Before an alternative retail electric supplier 4may warrant that it has a residential customer or small 5commercial retail customer's express consent agreement to 6access interval data as described in subsection (b) of Section 716-122 of the Public Utilities Act, the alternative retail 8electric supplier shall: (i) disclose to the consumer at the 9outset of the offer that the alternative retail electric 10supplier will access the consumer's interval data from the 11consumer's utility with the consumer's express agreement, and 12the consumer's option to refuse to provide express agreement 13to access the consumer's interval data; and (ii) obtain the 14consumer's express agreement for the alternative retail 15electric supplier to access the consumer's interval data from 16the consumer's utility in a separate letter of agency, a 17distinct response to a third-party verification, or during a 18recorded enrollment initiated by the consumer with the 19consumer's consent. The disclosure by the alternative retail 20electric supplier to the consumer in this Section shall be 21conducted in, translated into, and provided in a language in 22which the consumer subject to the disclosure is able to 23understand and communicate. 24    (2) Before an alternative retail electric supplier may 25warrant to an electric utility that it has an express 26agreement from a residential customer or small commercial   HB1284- 58 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1retail customer who was enrolled with the alternative retail 2electric supplier prior to the effective date of this 3amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly to access the 4consumer's interval data as described in subsection (b) of 5Section 16-122 of the Public Utilities Act, an alternative 6retail electric supplier shall: (i) disclose to the consumer 7that the alternative retail electric supplier will access the 8consumer's interval data from the consumer's utility with the 9consumer's express agreement, which is a material change to 10the consumer's existing contract terms, and the consumer's 11option to refuse to provide express agreement to access the 12consumer's interval data; and (ii) obtain the consumer's 13express agreement for the alternative retail electric supplier 14to change the consumer's material contract terms to access the 15consumer's interval data from the consumer's utility in a 16separate letter of agency, a distinct response to a 17third-party verification, or during a recorded enrollment 18initiated by the consumer with the consumer's consent. The 19disclosure by the alternative retail electric supplier to the 20consumer in this Section shall be conducted in, translated 21into, and provided in a language in which the consumer subject 22to the disclosure is able to understand and communicate. 23    (3) An alternative retail electric supplier may refuse to 24enroll or may disenroll a residential customer or small 25commercial retail customer in a product or service as 26described in paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of Section 16-122   HB1284- 59 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1of the Public Utilities Act if the residential customer or 2small commercial retail customer does not provide or revokes 3consent under this subsection. 4    (4) An alternative retail electric supplier shall not 5warrant that it has a non residential customer's, other than a 6small commercial retail customer, consent to access interval 7data as described in subsection (b) of Section 16-122 of the 8Public Utilities Act unless the contract between the 9alternative retail electric supplier and the customer 10explicitly provides the alternative retail electric supplier 11with permission to access the customer's interval meter usage 12data. An alternative retail electric supplier shall not 13release, sell, license, or otherwise disclose any customer 14interval data obtained under Section 16-122 of the Public 15Utilities Act to any third person except as provided for in 16Section 16-122 of the Public Utilities Act. 17    (e) For purposes of this Section:18    "Electric service provider" shall have the meaning given 19that phrase in Section 6.5 of the Attorney General Act.20    "Alternative retail electric supplier" has the meaning 21given to that term in Section 16-102 of the Public Utilities 22Act. 23(Source: P.A. 102-958, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 24103-237, eff. 6-30-23.) 25    (815 ILCS 505/2DDD)  HB1284- 60 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    Sec. 2DDD. Alternative gas suppliers.2    (a) Definitions.3        (1) "Alternative gas supplier" has the same meaning as 4    in Section 19-105 of the Public Utilities Act.5        (2) "Gas utility" has the same meaning as in Section 6    19-105 of the Public Utilities Act.7    (b) It is an unfair or deceptive act or practice within the 8meaning of Section 2 of this Act for any person to violate any 9provision of this Section.10    (c) Solicitation.11        (1) An alternative gas supplier shall not utilize the 12    name of a public utility in any manner that is deceptive or 13    misleading, including, but not limited to, implying or 14    otherwise leading a customer to believe that an 15    alternative gas supplier is soliciting on behalf of or is 16    an agent of a utility. An alternative gas supplier shall 17    not utilize the name, or any other identifying insignia, 18    graphics, or wording, that has been used at any time to 19    represent a public utility company or its services or to 20    identify, label, or define any of its natural gas supply 21    offers and shall not misrepresent the affiliation of any 22    alternative supplier with the gas utility, governmental 23    bodies, or consumer groups.24        (2) If any sales solicitation, agreement, contract, or 25    verification is translated into another language and 26    provided to a customer, all of the documents must be   HB1284- 61 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    provided to the customer in that other language.2        (2.3) An alternative gas supplier shall state that it 3    represents an independent seller of gas certified by the 4    Illinois Commerce Commission and that he or she is not 5    employed by, representing, endorsed by, or acting on 6    behalf of a utility, or a utility program.7        (2.5) All in-person and telephone solicitations shall 8    be conducted in, translated into, and provided in a 9    language in which the consumer subject to the marketing or 10    solicitation is able to understand and communicate. An 11    alternative gas supplier shall terminate a solicitation if 12    the consumer subject to the marketing or communication is 13    unable to understand and communicate in the language in 14    which the marketing or solicitation is being conducted. An 15    alternative gas supplier shall comply with Section 2N of 16    this Act. 17        (3) An alternative gas supplier shall clearly and 18    conspicuously disclose the following information to all 19    customers:20            (A) the prices, terms, and conditions of the 21        products and services being sold to the customer;22            (B) where the solicitation occurs in person, 23        including through door-to-door solicitation, the 24        salesperson's name;25            (C) the alternative gas supplier's contact 26        information, including the address, phone number, and   HB1284- 62 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        website;2            (D) contact information for the Illinois Commerce 3        Commission, including the toll-free number for 4        consumer complaints and website;5            (E) a statement of the customer's right to rescind 6        the offer within 10 business days of the date on the 7        utility's notice confirming the customer's decision to 8        switch suppliers, as well as phone numbers for the 9        supplier and utility that the consumer may use to 10        rescind the contract;11            (F) the amount of the early termination fee, if 12        any; and13            (G) the utility gas supply cost rates per therm 14        price available from the Illinois Commerce Commission 15        website applicable at the time the alternative gas 16        supplier is offering or selling the products or 17        services to the customer and shall disclose the 18        following statement:19            "(Name of the alternative gas supplier) is not the 20        same entity as your gas delivery company. You are not 21        required to enroll with (name of alternative retail 22        gas supplier). Beginning on (effective date), the 23        utility gas supply cost rate per therm is (cost). The 24        utility gas supply cost will expire on (expiration 25        date). For more information go to the Illinois 26        Commerce Commission's free website at   HB1284- 63 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        www.icc.illinois.gov/ags/consumereducation.aspx.". 2        (4) Except as provided in paragraph (5) of this 3    subsection (c), an alternative gas supplier shall send the 4    information described in paragraph (3) of this subsection 5    (c) to all customers within one business day of the 6    authorization of a switch.7        (5) An alternative gas supplier engaging in 8    door-to-door solicitation of consumers shall provide the 9    information described in paragraph (3) of this subsection 10    (c) during all door-to-door solicitations that result in a 11    customer deciding to switch his or her supplier.12    (d) Customer Authorization. An alternative gas supplier 13shall not submit or execute a change in a customer's selection 14of a natural gas provider unless and until: (i) the 15alternative gas supplier first discloses all material terms 16and conditions of the offer to the customer; (ii) the 17alternative gas supplier has obtained the customer's express 18agreement to accept the offer after the disclosure of all 19material terms and conditions of the offer; and (iii) the 20alternative gas supplier has confirmed the request for a 21change in accordance with one of the following procedures:22        (1) The alternative gas supplier has obtained the 23    customer's written or electronically signed authorization 24    in a form that meets the following requirements:25            (A) An alternative gas supplier shall obtain any 26        necessary written or electronically signed   HB1284- 64 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        authorization from a customer for a change in natural 2        gas service by using a letter of agency as specified in 3        this Section. Any letter of agency that does not 4        conform with this Section is invalid.5            (B) The letter of agency shall be a separate 6        document (or an easily separable document containing 7        only the authorization language described in item (E) 8        of this paragraph (1)) whose sole purpose is to 9        authorize a natural gas provider change. The letter of 10        agency must be signed and dated by the customer 11        requesting the natural gas provider change.12            (C) The letter of agency shall not be combined 13        with inducements of any kind on the same document.14            (D) Notwithstanding items (A) and (B) of this 15        paragraph (1), the letter of agency may be combined 16        with checks that contain only the required letter of 17        agency language prescribed in item (E) of this 18        paragraph (1) and the necessary information to make 19        the check a negotiable instrument. The letter of 20        agency check shall not contain any promotional 21        language or material. The letter of agency check shall 22        contain in easily readable, bold face type on the face 23        of the check, a notice that the consumer is 24        authorizing a natural gas provider change by signing 25        the check. The letter of agency language also shall be 26        placed near the signature line on the back of the   HB1284- 65 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        check.2            (E) At a minimum, the letter of agency must be 3        printed with a print of sufficient size to be clearly 4        legible, and must contain clear and unambiguous 5        language that confirms:6                (i) the customer's billing name and address;7                (ii) the decision to change the natural gas 8            provider from the current provider to the 9            prospective alternative gas supplier;10                (iii) the terms, conditions, and nature of the 11            service to be provided to the customer, including, 12            but not limited to, the rates for the service 13            contracted for by the customer; and14                (iv) that the customer understands that any 15            natural gas provider selection the customer 16            chooses may involve a charge to the customer for 17            changing the customer's natural gas provider.18            (F) Letters of agency shall not suggest or require 19        that a customer take some action in order to retain the 20        customer's current natural gas provider. 21            (G) If any portion of a letter of agency is 22        translated into another language, then all portions of 23        the letter of agency must be translated into that 24        language.25        (2) An appropriately qualified independent third party 26    has obtained, in accordance with the procedures set forth   HB1284- 66 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    in this paragraph (2), the customer's oral authorization 2    to change natural gas providers that confirms and includes 3    appropriate verification data. The independent third party 4    must: (i) not be owned, managed, controlled, or directed 5    by the alternative gas supplier or the alternative gas 6    supplier's marketing agent; (ii) not have any financial 7    incentive to confirm provider change requests for the 8    alternative gas supplier or the alternative gas supplier's 9    marketing agent; and (iii) operate in a location 10    physically separate from the alternative gas supplier or 11    the alternative gas supplier's marketing agent. Automated 12    third-party verification systems and 3-way conference 13    calls may be used for verification purposes so long as the 14    other requirements of this paragraph (2) are satisfied. An 15    alternative gas supplier or alternative gas supplier's 16    sales representative initiating a 3-way conference call or 17    a call through an automated verification system must drop 18    off the call once the 3-way connection has been 19    established. All third-party verification methods shall 20    elicit, at a minimum, the following information:21            (A) the identity of the customer;22            (B) confirmation that the person on the call is 23        authorized to make the provider change;24            (C) confirmation that the person on the call wants 25        to make the provider change;26            (D) the names of the providers affected by the   HB1284- 67 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        change;2            (E) the service address of the service to be 3        switched; and 4            (F) the price of the service to be provided and the 5        material terms and conditions of the service being 6        offered, including whether any early termination fees 7        apply.8        Third-party verifiers may not market the alternative 9    gas supplier's services. All third-party verifications 10    shall be conducted in the same language that was used in 11    the underlying sales transaction and shall be recorded in 12    their entirety. Submitting alternative gas suppliers shall 13    maintain and preserve audio records of verification of 14    customer authorization for a minimum period of 2 years 15    after obtaining the verification. Automated systems must 16    provide customers with an option to speak with a live 17    person at any time during the call. Each disclosure made 18    during the third-party verification must be made 19    individually to obtain clear acknowledgment of each 20    disclosure. The alternative gas supplier must be in a 21    location where he or she cannot hear the customer while 22    the third-party verification is conducted. The alternative 23    gas supplier shall not contact the customer after the 24    third-party verification for a period of 24 hours unless 25    the customer initiates the contact. 26        (3) The alternative gas supplier has obtained the   HB1284- 68 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1    customer's electronic authorization to change natural gas 2    service via telephone. Such authorization must elicit the 3    information in subparagraphs (A) through (F) of paragraph 4    (2) of this subsection (d). Alternative gas suppliers 5    electing to confirm sales electronically shall establish 6    one or more toll-free telephone numbers exclusively for 7    that purpose. Calls to the number or numbers shall connect 8    a customer to a voice response unit, or similar mechanism, 9    that makes a date-stamped, time-stamped recording of the 10    required information regarding the alternative gas 11    supplier change.12        The alternative gas supplier shall not use such 13    electronic authorization systems to market its services.14        (4) When a consumer initiates the call to the 15    prospective alternative gas supplier, in order to enroll 16    the consumer as a customer, the prospective alternative 17    gas supplier must, with the consent of the customer, make 18    a date-stamped, time-stamped audio recording that elicits, 19    at a minimum, the following information:20            (A) the identity of the customer;21            (B) confirmation that the person on the call is 22        authorized to make the provider change;23            (C) confirmation that the person on the call wants 24        to make the provider change;25            (D) the names of the providers affected by the 26        change;  HB1284- 69 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1            (E) the service address of the service to be 2        switched; and3            (F) the price of the service to be supplied and the 4        material terms and conditions of the service being 5        offered, including whether any early termination fees 6        apply.7        Submitting alternative gas suppliers shall maintain 8    and preserve the audio records containing the information 9    set forth above for a minimum period of 2 years. 10        (5) In the event that a customer enrolls for service 11    from an alternative gas supplier via an Internet website, 12    the alternative gas supplier shall obtain an 13    electronically signed letter of agency in accordance with 14    paragraph (1) of this subsection (d) and any customer 15    information shall be protected in accordance with all 16    applicable statutes and rules. In addition, an alternative 17    gas supplier shall provide the following when marketing 18    via an Internet website:19            (A) The Internet enrollment website shall, at a 20        minimum, include:21                (i) a copy of the alternative gas supplier's 22            customer contract, which clearly and conspicuously 23            discloses all terms and conditions; and24                (ii) a conspicuous prompt for the customer to 25            print or save a copy of the contract. 26            (B) Any electronic version of the contract shall   HB1284- 70 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        be identified by version number, in order to ensure 2        the ability to verify the particular contract to which 3        the customer assents.4            (C) Throughout the duration of the alternative gas 5        supplier's contract with a customer, the alternative 6        gas supplier shall retain and, within 3 business days 7        of the customer's request, provide to the customer an 8        email, paper, or facsimile of the terms and conditions 9        of the numbered contract version to which the customer 10        assents.11            (D) The alternative gas supplier shall provide a 12        mechanism by which both the submission and receipt of 13        the electronic letter of agency are recorded by time 14        and date.15            (E) After the customer completes the electronic 16        letter of agency, the alternative gas supplier shall 17        disclose conspicuously through its website that the 18        customer has been enrolled and the alternative gas 19        supplier shall provide the customer an enrollment 20        confirmation number.21        (6) When a customer is solicited in person by the 22    alternative gas supplier's sales agent, the alternative 23    gas supplier may only obtain the customer's authorization 24    to change natural gas service through the method provided 25    for in paragraph (2) of this subsection (d).26    Alternative gas suppliers must be in compliance with the   HB1284- 71 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1provisions of this subsection (d) within 90 days after April 210, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 95-1051). 3    (e) Early Termination.4        (1) Beginning January 1, 2020, consumers shall have 5    the right to terminate their contract with an alternative 6    gas supplier at any time without any termination fees or 7    penalties. 8        (2) In any agreement that contains an early 9    termination clause, an alternative gas supplier shall 10    provide the customer the opportunity to terminate the 11    agreement without any termination fee or penalty within 10 12    business days after the date of the first bill issued to 13    the customer for products or services provided by the 14    alternative gas supplier. The agreement shall disclose the 15    opportunity and provide a toll-free phone number that the 16    customer may call in order to terminate the agreement.17    (f) The alternative gas supplier shall provide each 18customer the opportunity to rescind its agreement without 19penalty within 10 business days after the date on the gas 20utility notice to the customer. The alternative gas supplier 21shall disclose to the customer all of the following: 22        (1) that the gas utility shall send a notice 23    confirming the switch;24        (2) that from the date the utility issues the notice 25    confirming the switch, the customer shall have 10 business 26    days before the switch will become effective;  HB1284- 72 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        (3) that the customer may contact the gas utility or 2    the alternative gas supplier to rescind the switch within 3    10 business days; and4        (4) the contact information for the gas utility and 5    the alternative gas supplier.6    The alternative gas supplier disclosure shall be included 7in its sales solicitations, contracts, and all applicable 8sales verification scripts.9    (f-5)(1) Beginning January 1, 2020, an alternative gas 10supplier shall not sell or offer to sell any products or 11services to a consumer pursuant to a contract in which the 12contract automatically renews, unless an alternative gas 13supplier provides to the consumer at the outset of the offer, 14in addition to other disclosures required by law, a separate 15written statement titled "Automatic Contract Renewal" that 16clearly and conspicuously discloses in bold lettering in at 17least 12-point font the terms and conditions of the automatic 18contract renewal provision, including: (i) the estimated bill 19cycle on which the initial contract term expires and a 20statement that it could be later based on when the utility 21accepts the initial enrollment; (ii) the estimated bill cycle 22on which the new contract term begins and a statement that it 23will immediately follow the last billing cycle of the current 24term; (iii) the procedure to terminate the contract before the 25new contract term applies; and (iv) the cancellation 26procedure. If the alternative gas supplier sells or offers to   HB1284- 73 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1sell the products or services to a consumer during an 2in-person solicitation or telemarketing solicitation, the 3disclosures described in this paragraph (1) shall also be made 4to the consumer verbally during the solicitation. Nothing in 5this paragraph (1) shall be construed to apply to contracts 6entered into before January 1, 2020. 7    (2) At least 30 days before, but not more than 60 days 8prior, to the end of the initial contract term, in any and all 9contracts that automatically renew after the initial term, the 10alternative gas supplier shall send, in addition to other 11disclosures required by law, a separate written notice of the 12contract renewal to the consumer that clearly and 13conspicuously discloses the following:14        (A) a statement printed or visible from the outside of 15    the envelope or in the subject line of the email, if the 16    customer has agreed to receive official documents by 17    email, that states "Contract Renewal Notice";18        (B) a statement in bold lettering, in at least 19    12-point font, that the contract will automatically renew 20    unless the customer cancels it;21        (C) the billing cycle in which service under the 22    current term will expire;23        (D) the billing cycle in which service under the new 24    term will begin;25        (E) the process and options available to the consumer 26    to reject the new contract terms;  HB1284- 74 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1        (F) the cancellation process if the consumer's 2    contract automatically renews before the consumer rejects 3    the new contract terms;4        (G) the terms and conditions of the new contract term;5        (H) for a fixed rate or flat bill contract, a 6    side-by-side comparison of the current fixed rate or flat 7    bill to the new fixed rate or flat bill; for a variable 8    rate contract or time-of-use product in which the first 9    month's renewal price can be determined, a side-by-side 10    comparison of the current price and the price for the 11    first month of the new variable or time-of-use price; or 12    for a variable or time-of-use contract based on a publicly 13    available index, a side-by-side comparison of the current 14    formula and the new formula; and 15        (I) the phone number and Internet address to submit a 16    consumer inquiry or complaint to the Illinois Commerce 17    Commission and the Office of the Attorney General. 18    (3) An alternative gas supplier shall not automatically 19renew a consumer's enrollment after the current term of the 20contract expires when the current term of the contract 21provides that the consumer will be charged a fixed rate and the 22renewed contract provides that the consumer will be charged a 23variable rate, unless: (i) the alternative gas supplier 24complies with paragraphs (1) and (2); and (ii) the customer 25expressly consents to the contract renewal in writing or by 26electronic signature at least 30 days, but no more than 60   HB1284- 75 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1days, before the contract expires.2    (4) An alternative gas supplier shall not automatically 3renew a consumer's enrollment after the current term of the 4contract expires if the renewed contract provides that the 5consumer will be charged a rate higher than the current 6contract rate unless: (i) the alternative gas supplier 7complies with paragraphs (1) and (2); and (ii) the customer 8expressly consents to the contract renewal in writing or by 9electronic signature at least 30 days, but no more than 60 10days, before the contract expires. 11    (5) (4) An alternative gas supplier shall not submit a 12change to a customer's gas service provider in violation of 13Section 19-116 of the Public Utilities Act. 14    (g) The provisions of this Section shall apply only to 15alternative gas suppliers serving or seeking to serve 16residential and small commercial customers and only to the 17extent such alternative gas suppliers provide services to 18residential and small commercial customers. 19    (h) Complaints may be filed with the Commission under this 20Section by a consumer whose gas service has been provided by an 21alternative retail gas supplier in a manner not in compliance 22with this Section or by the Commission on its own motion when 23it appears to the Commission that an alternative retail gas 24supplier has provided service in a manner not in compliance 25with this Section. If, after notice and hearing, the 26Commission finds that an alternative retail gas supplier has   HB1284- 76 -LRB104 03458 AAS 13481 b1violated this Section, the Commission may in its discretion do 2any one or more of the following: 3        (1) require the alternative retail gas supplier to 4    refund to the consumer charges collected in excess of 5    those that would have been charged by the consumer's 6    authorized gas service provider; 7        (2) require the alternative retail gas supplier to pay 8    to the consumer's authorized gas service provider the 9    amount the authorized gas service provider would have 10    collected for the gas service. The Commission is 11    authorized to reduce this payment by any amount already 12    paid by the alternative retail gas to the consumer's 13    authorized provider for gas service; 14        (3) require the alternative retail electric supplier 15    to pay a fine of up to $10,000 per occurrence into the 16    Public Utility Fund for each violation of this Section; 17        (4) issue a cease and desist order; and 18        (5) for a pattern of violation of this Section or for 19    violations that continue after a cease and desist order, 20    revoke the alternative retail gas supplier's certificate 21    of service authority. 22(Source: P.A. 101-590, eff. 1-1-20; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 23102-958, eff. 1-1-23.)